District of Columbia statutes.
16-1335

Availability of appropriations for purchase of excess property.

When real property is purchased pursuant to this subchapter in excess of that needed for a particular project or improvement, appropriations available for the payment of the purchase price, costs, and expenses incident to the project or improvement may be used in the payment of the purchase price, costs, and expenses of excess real property purchased in connection with the project or improvement, as provided by this subchapter.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 576, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1335.
1973 Ed., § 16-1335.